Maine, session 132, LD2244.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of
Revenue Services to administer survey to assessors on Maine Tree Growth Tax
Law. The Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of Revenue
Services shall administer a survey to assessors related to the Maine Tree Growth Tax Law.
In the design of the survey, the bureau shall collaborate with the Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry, Maine Forest Service, the University of Maine School of Forest
Resources, landowners, foresters, municipal officials and assessors. The survey must, at a
minimum, collect information from assessors regarding their experiences administering the
Maine Tree Growth Tax Law.
The Bureau of Revenue Services shall submit its findings and recommendations based
on the survey results, including suggested legislation, no later than January 15, 2027 to the
joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over taxation matters. The
joint standing committee may report out legislation based on the findings and
recommendations to the 133rd Legislature in 2027.
Sec. 2. Resolve 2025, c. 108, §5 is amended to read:
Sec. 5. Meetings; subcommittees. Resolved: That the task force shall meet at
least 4 times but no more than 8 times in 2025 and no more than 8 times in 2026, not
including any subcommittee meetings.
1. The task force shall meet at least once jointly with the Joint Standing Committee on
Taxation at a time to be determined by the chairs of the task force and the committee.
2. The chairs of the task force may appoint subcommittees as necessary for the efficient
operation of the task force.
Page 1 - 132LR3087(04)